Utah statutes.
19-6-317.   Remedial investigation report -- Remedial action plan
implementation -- Legal remedies.
(1)  Upon receipt of a remedial investigation report for a national priority
list site, the executive director shall:
(a)  review the report;
(b)  provide a period for public comment;
(c)  issue an order defining a remedial action plan consistent with CERCLA for
the facility; and
(d)  follow the procedures established by the National Contingency Plan to
avoid inconsistent state and federal action.
(2) (a)  To implement the remedial action plan, the executive director shall
seek to reach an agreement with all responsible parties to perform the
remedial action.
(b)  The executive director may define in the agreement the remedial action
required and the time limits for completion of the remedial action.
(c)  If the responsible parties fail to perform as required under an agreement
entered under the authority of this section, the executive director may take
action to enforce the agreement.
(3) (a)  If the executive director is unable to reach an agreement with one or
more responsible parties to perform remedial action, he  may order all
responsible parties to perform the remedial action.
(b)  The executive director may define in the order the remedial action
required and the time limits for completion of the remedial action.
